Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.090

Judgment against homestead owner—Lien on excess value of homestead property.

A judgment against the owner of a homestead shall become a lien on the value of the homestead property in excess of the homestead exemption from the time the judgment creditor records the judgment with the recording officer of the county where the property is located. However, if a judgment of a district court of this state has been transferred to a superior court, the judgment becomes a lien from the time of recording with such recording officer a duly certified abstract of the record of such judgment as it appears in the office of the clerk in which the transfer was originally filed. A department of revenue tax warrant filed pursuant to RCW 82.32.210 shall become a lien on the value of the homestead property in excess of the homestead exemption from the time of filing in superior court.

[ 2007 c 429 s 3; 1988 c 231 s 4; 1987 c 442 s 209; 1984 c 260 s 30. Formerly RCW 6.12.105.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.